Hawaii statutes.
§657‑1.8 Civil action arising from
sexual offenses; application; certificate of merit. (a) Notwithstanding
any law to the contrary, except as provided under subsection (b), no action for
recovery of damages based on physical, psychological, or other injury or
condition suffered by a minor arising from the sexual abuse of the minor by any
person shall be commenced against the person who committed the act of sexual
abuse more than:

(1) Eight years after the eighteenth birthday of the
minor or the person who committed the act of sexual abuse attains the age of
majority, whichever occurs later; or

(2) Three years after the date the minor discovers or
reasonably should have discovered that psychological injury or illness
occurring after the age of minor's eighteenth birthday was caused by the sexual
abuse,

whichever comes later.

A civil cause of action for the sexual abuse of
a minor shall be based upon sexual acts that constituted or would have
constituted a criminal offense under part V or VI of chapter 707.

(b) For a period of four years after April 24,
2012, a victim of child sexual abuse that occurred in this State may file a
claim in a circuit court of this State against the person who committed the act
of sexual abuse if the victim is barred from filing a claim against the
victim's abuser due to the expiration of the applicable civil statute of
limitations that was in effect prior to April 24, 2012.

A claim may also be brought under this
subsection against a legal entity if:

(1) The person who committed the act of sexual abuse
against the victim was employed by an institution, agency, firm, business,
corporation, or other public or private legal entity that owed a duty of care
to the victim; or

(2) The person who committed the act of sexual abuse
and the victim were engaged in an activity over which the legal entity had a
degree of responsibility or control.

Damages against the legal entity shall be
awarded under this subsection only if there is a finding of gross negligence on
the part of the legal entity.

(c) A defendant against whom a civil action is
commenced may recover attorney's fees if the court determines that a false
accusation was made with no basis in fact and with malicious intent. A verdict
in favor of the defendant shall not be the sole basis for a determination that
an accusation had no basis in fact and was made with malicious intent. The
court shall make an independent finding of an improper motive prior to awarding
attorney's fees under this section.

(d) In any civil action filed pursuant to
subsection (a) or (b), a certificate of merit shall be filed by the attorney
for the plaintiff, and shall be sealed and remain confidential. The
certificate of merit shall include a notarized statement by a:

(1) Psychologist licensed pursuant to chapter 465;

(2) Marriage and family therapist licensed pursuant
to chapter 451J;

(3) Mental health counselor licensed pursuant to
chapter 453D; or

(4) Clinical social worker licensed pursuant to
chapter 467E;

who is knowledgeable in the relevant facts and
issues involved in the action, who is not a party to the action.

The notarized statement included in the
certificate of merit shall set forth in reasonable detail the facts and
opinions relied upon to conclude that there is a reasonable basis to believe
that the plaintiff was subject to one or more acts that would result in an
injury or condition specified in [subsection] (a). [L 2012, c 68, §1; am L
2014, c 112, §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next